Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 10 TLSB 5545HV (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2533 DIVISION I 1 PROFESSIONAL PERMIT TO CARRY WEAPONS 2 Section 1. Section 724.6, subsection 1, paragraph a, 3 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) A person may be issued a permit to carry weapons when 5 the personâs employment in a private investigation business 6 or private security business licensed under chapter 80A , or a 7 personâs employment as a peace officer, correctional officer, 8 judicial officer, county attorney, assistant county attorney, 9 attorney general, deputy attorney general, assistant attorney 10 general, security guard, bank messenger or other person 11 transporting property of a value requiring security, or in 12 police work, reasonably justifies that person going armed. 13 Sec. 2. Section 724.6, subsection 1, paragraph a, 14 subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 (4) A person may be issued a permit to carry weapons if the 16 person is a judicial officer, county attorney , or an assistant 17 county attorney , attorney general, deputy attorney general, or 18 assistant attorney general . An application for a permit by 19 an assistant county attorney must be approved by the county 20 attorney of each county in which the applicant serves prior to 21 a permit to carry weapons being issued. An application for 22 a permit by the attorney general or deputy attorney general 23 or by an assistant attorney general shall be delivered to 24 the sheriff for the county in which the applicant resides. 25 The sheriff of the issuing county may require the applicant 26 to complete a proficiency examination prior to issuing the 27 permit to carry weapons. The standards for a proficiency 28 examination for a judicial officer, county attorney , or 29 assistant county attorney , attorney general, deputy attorney 30 general, or assistant attorney general shall not exceed the 31 standards required of a peace officer. The applicant shall pay 32 the reasonable costs associated with completing a proficiency 33 examination. 34 Sec. 3. Section 724.6, subsection 1, paragraphs b, c, and d, 35 -1- LSB 5545HV (2) 91 as/js 1/ 7 H.F. 2533 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 1 b. The permit shall be on a form prescribed and published 2 by the commissioner of public safety, shall identify the 3 holder, and shall state the nature of the employment requiring 4 the holder to go armed. A permit so issued, other than to a 5 peace officer, judicial officer, county attorney, or assistant 6 county attorney, attorney general, deputy attorney general, 7 or assistant attorney general, shall authorize the person to 8 whom it is issued to go armed anywhere in the state, only while 9 engaged in the employment, and while going to and from the 10 place of the employment. 11 c. A permit issued to a certified peace officer, judicial 12 officer, county attorney, or assistant county attorney , 13 attorney general, deputy attorney general, or assistant 14 attorney general shall authorize that peace officer, judicial 15 officer, county attorney, or assistant county attorney , 16 attorney general, deputy attorney general, or assistant 17 attorney general to go armed anywhere in the state at all 18 times, including on the grounds of a school. 19 d. Permits shall expire twelve months after the date when 20 issued except that permits issued to peace officers, judicial 21 officers, county attorneys, assistant county attorneys, the 22 attorney general, deputy attorneys general, assistant attorneys 23 general, and correctional officers are valid through the 24 holder of the permitâs period of employment unless otherwise 25 canceled. When the employment is terminated, the holder of the 26 permit shall surrender it the permit to the issuing officer for 27 cancellation. 28 Sec. 4. Section 724.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 29 by adding the following new paragraph: 30 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Notwithstanding any other provision in 31 this section, a person issued a permit to carry weapons under 32 this section may carry weapons only in a concealed manner when 33 inside a courtroom. This paragraph does not apply to peace 34 officers or correctional officers when fulfilling their duties 35 -2- LSB 5545HV (2) 91 as/js 2/ 7 H.F. 2533 of employment. 1 Sec. 5. Section 724.6, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 3. For purposes of this section , âemergency medical care 4 providerâ : 5 a. âEmergency medical care providerâ means the same as 6 defined in section 147A.1 . 7 b. âJudicial officerâ means the same as defined in section 8 602.1101. 9 Sec. 6. Section 724.6, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 10 following new subsection: 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. The supreme court may by rule impose 12 additional training or other requirements on judicial officers 13 who hold a permit issued under this section. 14 DIVISION II 15 THREATS AGAINST A JUDICIAL OFFICER OR AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY 16 MEMBER OF A JUDICIAL OFFICER 17 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 708.17 Threatening a judicial officer 18 or an immediate family member of a judicial officer. 19 1. No person shall threaten a judicial officer or the 20 immediate family member of a judicial officer with the intent 21 to do any of the following: 22 a. Place the judicial officer or the immediate family member 23 of a judicial officer in fear of serious injury to the judicial 24 officer or the immediate family member of the judicial officer. 25 b. Prevent or interrupt the ability of the judicial officer 26 to carry out the judicial officerâs job duties. 27 c. Retaliate against a judicial officer in relation to the 28 performance of the judicial officerâs official duties during 29 the judicial officerâs term of service. 30 2. A person who violates the provisions of this section is 31 guilty of a class âCâ felony. 32 3. As used in this section: 33 a. âImmediate family memberâ means a spouse, child, sibling, 34 parent, grandparent, or grandchild, and includes a stepparent, 35 -3- LSB 5545HV (2) 91 as/js 3/ 7 H.F. 2533 a stepchild, a stepsibling, or an adoptive relationship. 1 b. âJudicial officerâ means the same as defined in section 2 602.1101. 3 c. âRetaliateâ means intentionally threatening bodily injury 4 to or damage to the property of a judicial officer with intent 5 to retaliate against the judicial officer for the judicial 6 officerâs exercise of judicial duties and causing the judicial 7 officer or the family member to reasonably believe that the 8 judicial officerâs or the family memberâs person or property 9 is in danger. 10 DIVISION III 11 MALICIOUS SHARING OF PERSONAL INFORMATION 12 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 708.18 Malicious sharing of personal 13 information of a judicial officer or an immediate family member 14 of a judicial officer. 15 1. No person shall share the personal information of a 16 judicial officer or the immediate family member of a judicial 17 officer with the intent to do any of the following: 18 a. Cause harm to the judicial officer or the immediate 19 family member of a judicial officer. 20 b. Place the judicial officer or the immediate family member 21 of a judicial officer in fear of serious harm to the judicial 22 officer or to an immediate family member of the judicial 23 officer. 24 c. Prevent or interrupt the ability to carry out the 25 judicial officerâs job duties. 26 2. A person who violates the provisions of this section is 27 guilty of a serious misdemeanor. 28 3. As used in this section: 29 a. âImmediate family memberâ means a spouse, child, sibling, 30 parent, grandparent, or grandchild, and includes a stepparent, 31 a stepchild, a stepsibling, or an adoptive relationship. 32 b. âJudicial officerâ means the same as defined in section 33 602.1101. 34 c. âPersonal informationâ means a personâs personal physical 35 -4- LSB 5545HV (2) 91 as/js 4/ 7 H.F. 2533 address, personal phone number, or physical location. 1 DIVISION IV 2 THREATS INCLUDING TO PUBLIC OFFICIALS 3 Sec. 9. Section 708.7, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 4 by adding the following new paragraph: 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. A person commits harassment when the 6 person communicates a true threat, including an intent to 7 cause bodily injury to a public official, as defined in 8 section 68B.2, and the public official becomes aware of such 9 communication within one year of the threat. 10